West Virginia, session 2025, SB395.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 9. Authorization for miscellaneous boards and agencies to promulgate legislative rules. §64-9-1. Board of Pharmacy. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 24, 2024, authorized under the authority of §30-1-23 of this code, relating to the Board of Pharmacy (application of waiver of initial licensing fees for certain individuals, 15 CSR 18), is authorized.